browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1463 Y 1
SFX 1463 0 rist .
SFX 1873 Y 1
SFX 1873 0 izi .
SFX 1322 Y 1
SFX 1322 0 urain .
SFX 1321 Y 1
SFX 1321 0 urais .
SFX 3024 Y 1
SFX 3024 0 tabilitad .
SFX 2325 Y 1
SFX 2325 0 anada .
SFX 3578 Y 1
SFX 3578 0 anads .
SFX 1804 Y 1
SFX 1804 0 tschava .
SFX 1412 Y 1
SFX 1412 0 ureschia .
SFX 1120 Y 1
SFX 1120 0 riva .
SFX 745 Y 1
SFX 745 0 ifitgeschian .
SFX 744 Y 1
SFX 744 0 ifitgeschias .
SFX 3603 Y 1
SFX 3603 0 acitad .
SFX 801 Y 1
SFX 801 0 chada .
SFX 3167 Y 1
SFX 3167 0 nisà .
SFX 799 Y 1
SFX 799 0 chads .
SFX 2382 Y 1
SFX 2382 0 udia .
SFX 3821 Y 1
SFX 3821 0 ttà .
SFX 865 Y 1
SFX 865 0 lmain .
SFX 4241 Y 1
SFX 4241 0 oriseschia .
SFX 3661 Y 1
SFX 3661 0 urant .
SFX 1858 Y 1
SFX 1858 0 nadra .
SFX 3604 Y 1
SFX 3604 0 achau .
SFX 1066 Y 1
SFX 1066 0 gassan .
SFX 1065 Y 1
SFX 1065 0 gassas .
SFX 3576 Y 1
SFX 3576 0 anain .
SFX 2324 Y 1
SFX 2324 0 anais .
SFX 2572 Y 1
SFX 2572 0 litads .
SFX 2212 Y 1
SFX 2212 0 irassan .
SFX 2211 Y 1
SFX 2211 0 irassas .
SFX 4953 Y 1
SFX 4953 0 bai .
SFX 1762 Y 1
SFX 1762 0 bar .
SFX 4951 Y 1
SFX 4951 0 bas .
SFX 3326 Y 1
SFX 3326 0 ical .
SFX 370 Y 1
SFX 370 0 icas .
SFX 4617 Y 1
SFX 4617 0 icat .
SFX 1822 Y 1
SFX 1822 0 tamain .
SFX 2778 Y 1
SFX 2778 0 clavan .
SFX 2777 Y 1
SFX 2777 0 clavas .
SFX 365 Y 1
SFX 365 0 chain .
SFX 392 Y 1
SFX 392 0 chais .
SFX 4523 Y 1
SFX 4523 0 istian .
SFX 4522 Y 1
SFX 4522 0 istias .
SFX 4855 Y 1
SFX 4855 0 curridas .
SFX 4910 Y 1
SFX 4910 0 bratsch .
SFX 3117 Y 1
SFX 3117 0 ponida .
SFX 5000 Y 1
SFX 5000 0 aneschan .
SFX 4999 Y 1
SFX 4999 0 aneschas .
SFX 985 Y 1
SFX 985 0 abladad .
SFX 1320 Y 1
SFX 1320 0 urass .
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 0 lisond .
SFX 3248 Y 1
SFX 3248 0 itgeschan .
SFX 3247 Y 1
SFX 3247 0 itgeschas .
SFX 422 Y 1
SFX 422 0 istica .
SFX 4521 Y 1
SFX 4521 0 istics .
SFX 4203 Y 1
SFX 4203 0 postas .
SFX 399 Y 1
SFX 399 0 zà .
SFX 3591 Y 1
SFX 3591 0 alai .
SFX 3589 Y 1
SFX 3589 0 alar .
SFX 252 Y 1
SFX 252 0 alas .
SFX 4520 Y 1
SFX 4520 0 istida .
SFX 107 Y 1
SFX 107 0 bel .
SFX 4944 Y 1
SFX 4944 0 ber .
SFX 4936 Y 1
SFX 4936 0 bet .
SFX 3013 Y 1
SFX 3013 0 tella .
SFX 4040 Y 1
SFX 4040 0 segnond .
SFX 730 Y 1
SFX 730 0 chà .
SFX 4518 Y 1
SFX 4518 0 istids .
SFX 1402 Y 1
SFX 1402 0 chì .
SFX 2961 Y 1
SFX 2961 0 turà .
SFX 1317 Y 1
SFX 1317 0 urava .
SFX 4943 Y 1
SFX 4943 0 besch .
SFX 394 Y 1
SFX 394 0 zond .
SFX 3245 Y 1
SFX 3245 0 itgeschian .
SFX 3244 Y 1
SFX 3244 0 itgeschias .
SFX 688 Y 1
SFX 688 0 ifitgadas .
SFX 2539 Y 1
SFX 2539 0 oteca .
SFX 1267 Y 1
SFX 1267 0 nescha .
SFX 1988 Y 1
SFX 1988 0 ziunond .
SFX 3312 Y 1
SFX 3312 0 idesch .
SFX 3762 Y 1
SFX 3762 0 ualisond .
SFX 611 Y 1
SFX 611 0 savan .
SFX 610 Y 1
SFX 610 0 savas .
SFX 3574 Y 1
SFX 3574 0 anass .
SFX 3436 Y 1
SFX 3436 0 egliadas .
SFX 4435 Y 1
SFX 4435 0 lent .
SFX 4998 Y 1
SFX 4998 0 aneschia .
SFX 3241 Y 1
SFX 3241 0 itscha .
SFX 883 Y 1
SFX 883 0 usas .
SFX 4581 Y 1
SFX 4581 0 ifitgader .
SFX 504 Y 1
SFX 504 0 alisavan .
SFX 503 Y 1
SFX 503 0 alisavas .
SFX 1700 Y 1
SFX 1700 0 igliond .
SFX 3246 Y 1
SFX 3246 0 itgeschia .
SFX 1477 Y 1
SFX 1477 0 ograf .
SFX 2139 Y 1
SFX 2139 0 ogram .
SFX 200 Y 1
SFX 200 0 bla .
SFX 760 Y 1
SFX 760 0 chass .
SFX 2234 Y 1
SFX 2234 0 icla .
SFX 3571 Y 1
SFX 3571 0 anava .
SFX 3581 Y 1
SFX 3581 0 alia .
SFX 816 Y 1
SFX 816 0 schevan .
SFX 815 Y 1
SFX 815 0 schevas .
SFX 4509 Y 1
SFX 4509 0 istorgia .
SFX 3322 Y 1
SFX 3322 0 iclà .
SFX 2086 Y 1
SFX 2086 0 stradas .
SFX 1363 Y 1
SFX 1363 0 lera .
SFX 1493 Y 1
SFX 1493 0 ivaziun .
SFX 4432 Y 1
SFX 4432 0 lers .
SFX 4433 Y 1
SFX 4433 0 lentà .
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 0 chava .
SFX 3379 Y 1
SFX 3379 0 fitgà .
SFX 4517 Y 1
SFX 4517 0 istind .
SFX 1745 Y 1
SFX 1745 0 giai .
SFX 916 Y 1
SFX 916 0 gian .
SFX 1556 Y 1
SFX 1556 0 giar .
SFX 2049 Y 1
SFX 2049 0 uadas .
SFX 750 Y 1
SFX 750 0 gias .
SFX 669 Y 1
SFX 669 0 dà .
SFX 1095 Y 1
SFX 1095 0 dì .
SFX 4287 Y 1
SFX 4287 0 ocond .
SFX 1923 Y 1
SFX 1923 0 geschan .
SFX 1922 Y 1
SFX 1922 0 geschas .
SFX 2011 Y 1
SFX 2011 0 vista .
SFX 3544 Y 1
SFX 3544 0 biologia .
SFX 4739 Y 1
SFX 4739 0 erlesch .
SFX 3348 Y 1
SFX 3348 0 gida .
SFX 1376 Y 1
SFX 1376 0 icra .
SFX 4673 Y 1
SFX 4673 0 gids .
SFX 2844 Y 1
SFX 2844 0 anà .
SFX 1094 Y 1
SFX 1094 0 didas .
SFX 2009 Y 1
SFX 2009 0 ziunà .
SFX 4515 Y 1
SFX 4515 0 istiss .
SFX 1656 Y 1
SFX 1656 0 mentai .
SFX 4395 Y 1
SFX 4395 0 mentan .
SFX 1653 Y 1
SFX 1653 0 mentar .
SFX 3222 Y 1
SFX 3222 0 mentas .
SFX 3714 Y 1
SFX 3714 0 unaliseschan .
SFX 3992 Y 1
SFX 3992 0 steschan .
SFX 4908 Y 1
SFX 4908 0 bun .
SFX 3713 Y 1
SFX 3713 0 unaliseschas .
SFX 3991 Y 1
SFX 3991 0 steschas .
SFX 4184 Y 1
SFX 4184 0 rament .
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 0 bus .
SFX 4594 Y 1
SFX 4594 0 icum .
SFX 3876 Y 1
SFX 3876 0 tivescha .
SFX 1242 Y 1
SFX 1242 0 tabel .
SFX 4975 Y 1
SFX 4975 0 atassan .
SFX 4974 Y 1
SFX 4974 0 atassas .
SFX 1991 Y 1
SFX 1991 0 ziuneschan .
SFX 1966 Y 1
SFX 1966 0 aivels .
SFX 1990 Y 1
SFX 1990 0 ziuneschas .
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 0 fada .
SFX 1391 Y 1
SFX 1391 0 fads .
SFX 4512 Y 1
SFX 4512 0 istiva .
SFX 2360 Y 1
SFX 2360 0 vegn .
SFX 2995 Y 1
SFX 2995 0 tificaziun .
SFX 2217 Y 1
SFX 2217 0 irai .
SFX 2613 Y 1
SFX 2613 0 iran .
SFX 2214 Y 1
SFX 2214 0 irar .
SFX 961 Y 1
SFX 961 0 iras .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 tisassan .
SFX 3454 Y 1
SFX 3454 0 dider .
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 0 tisassas .
SFX 1921 Y 1
SFX 1921 0 geschia .
SFX 4379 Y 1
SFX 4379 0 missiun .
SFX 2797 Y 1
SFX 2797 0 atiseschian .
SFX 2796 Y 1
SFX 2796 0 atiseschias .
SFX 4376 Y 1
SFX 4376 0 mpadas .
SFX 1757 Y 1
SFX 1757 0 eglia .
SFX 1519 Y 1
SFX 1519 0 iunassan .
SFX 2314 Y 1
SFX 2314 0 cultura .
SFX 1518 Y 1
SFX 1518 0 iunassas .
SFX 1058 Y 1
SFX 1058 0 iesch .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 atisadas .
SFX 1216 Y 1
SFX 1216 0 tiseschian .
SFX 1498 Y 1
SFX 1498 0 ivassan .
SFX 1215 Y 1
SFX 1215 0 tiseschias .
SFX 1497 Y 1
SFX 1497 0 ivassas .
SFX 2987 Y 1
SFX 2987 0 tisaziun .
SFX 1126 Y 1
SFX 1126 0 peschan .
SFX 1125 Y 1
SFX 1125 0 peschas .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 scha .
SFX 2107 Y 1
SFX 2107 0 schi .
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 0 zavan .
SFX 4232 Y 1
SFX 4232 0 ottar .
SFX 1608 Y 1
SFX 1608 0 schs .
SFX 4231 Y 1
SFX 4231 0 ottas .
SFX 1374 Y 1
SFX 1374 0 ieschian .
SFX 410 Y 1
SFX 410 0 zavas .
SFX 1278 Y 1
SFX 1278 0 ieschias .
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 0 fain .
SFX 1297 Y 1
SFX 1297 0 fais .
SFX 4671 Y 1
SFX 4671 0 gind .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 vels .
SFX 4718 Y 1
SFX 4718 0 estescha .
SFX 2836 Y 1
SFX 2836 0 aschadas .
SFX 4393 Y 1
SFX 4393 0 mentia .
SFX 2084 Y 1
SFX 2084 0 tabla .
SFX 1801 Y 1
SFX 1801 0 tschian .
SFX 1800 Y 1
SFX 1800 0 tschias .
SFX 4105 Y 1
SFX 4105 0 schentà .
SFX 516 Y 1
SFX 516 0 adira .
SFX 3712 Y 1
SFX 3712 0 unaliseschia .
SFX 3990 Y 1
SFX 3990 0 steschia .
SFX 1648 Y 1
SFX 1648 0 mentavan .
SFX 1647 Y 1
SFX 1647 0 mentavas .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 ussa .
SFX 2018 Y 1
SFX 2018 0 vegnidas .
SFX 3761 Y 1
SFX 3761 0 ucziun .
SFX 3553 Y 1
SFX 3553 0 atschas .
SFX 1989 Y 1
SFX 1989 0 ziuneschia .
SFX 1579 Y 1
SFX 1579 0 vent .
SFX 3422 Y 1
SFX 3422 0 egnà .
SFX 2313 Y 1
SFX 2313 0 curs .
SFX 3951 Y 1
SFX 3951 0 tegiond .
SFX 3391 Y 1
SFX 3391 0 ertas .
SFX 3263 Y 1
SFX 3263 0 iria .
SFX 3507 Y 1
SFX 3507 0 cedissan .
SFX 2394 Y 1
SFX 2394 0 ttada .
SFX 3506 Y 1
SFX 3506 0 cedissas .
SFX 3819 Y 1
SFX 3819 0 ttads .
SFX 4669 Y 1
SFX 4669 0 gira .
SFX 4860 Y 1
SFX 4860 0 currì .
SFX 1736 Y 1
SFX 1736 0 gnadas .
SFX 998 Y 1
SFX 998 0 rescha .
SFX 4668 Y 1
SFX 4668 0 giss .
SFX 1743 Y 1
SFX 1743 0 giassan .
SFX 1554 Y 1
SFX 1554 0 giassas .
SFX 2716 Y 1
SFX 2716 0 eresch .
SFX 2345 Y 1
SFX 2345 0 vers .
SFX 901 Y 1
SFX 901 0 meter .
SFX 2468 Y 1
SFX 2468 0 scop .
SFX 2161 Y 1
SFX 2161 0 nissem .
SFX 1124 Y 1
SFX 1124 0 peschia .
SFX 3155 Y 1
SFX 3155 0 nisavan .
SFX 3154 Y 1
SFX 3154 0 nisavas .
SFX 3128 Y 1
SFX 3128 0 onais .
SFX 3346 Y 1
SFX 3346 0 giva .
SFX 3251 Y 1
SFX 3251 0 itativ .
SFX 3817 Y 1
SFX 3817 0 ttain .
SFX 3816 Y 1
SFX 3816 0 ttais .
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 0 aunas .
SFX 543 Y 1
SFX 543 0 sà .
SFX 2845 Y 1
SFX 2845 0 'alva .
