browser/locales/l10n/rm/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/rm.dic
carica/9,10,11,12,13,14,15,16,17,18,19,22,24,47,1550,1718,1719,1720,1721,1722,1723,2961
colla/1289,1405,1468,1762,2052,2791,3546,4911,4937,4938,4939,4940,4941,4942,4943,4946,4947,4948,4949,4950,4952,4953,4954,4955,4956
cont/1,5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,57,58,59,80,83,154,183,192,265,315,442,626,928,1045,1204,1205,1314,1315,1316,1317,1318,1319,1320,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1412,1413,1414,1415,1416,1581,1582,2370,2372,3389,3602,3642,4712,4720,4721,4722,4723,4724
cristal/1,554,577,594,595,596,780
fis/1,9,23,27,56,67,99,180,235,730,1007,1245,1376,1377,1404,1695,1765,2410,2629,2630,2631,2632,2633,2634,2635,2636,2637,2638,2788,3284,3287,3288,3289,3290,3291,3292,3293,3294,3295,3296,3297,3326,4617,4906,4907
gala/75,155,255,322,336,1463,1912,2573,2723,3140,4322
gip/1845,2539
giud/30,31,32,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,194,309,372,376,472,534,782,1677,1873,2185,2186,2187,2188,2189,2190,2191,2192,2193,2194,2195,2196,2197,2198,3244,3245,3246,3247,3248,3249,3250,3325,3327,4313,4403,4617
ipoteca/1,11,66,83,107,244,360,3102
lava/310,363,664,869,870,967,1009,1010,1011,1012,1013,1060,1062,1063,1064,1065,1066,1067,1068,1933,2162,3543,3652,3946
log/3,4,5,10,67,79,99,183,197,362,373,391,408,422,1007,1376,1377,1473,3326
maxima/1,12,66,77,79,251,865,2905
mini/454,643,1307,1762,2313,2320,3046,3467
moda/1,77,79,174,182,358,467,1017,1090,2572,3302,4562,4570,4571,4572,4573,4574,4575,4576,4577,4578,4579,4580,4582,4583,4584
monopol/1,88,106,109,110,113,114,115,116,117,118,119,120,121,122,123,124,125,126,127,128,129,130,131,134,197,422
mur/3,5,6,9,10,15,57,78,86,135,145,146,147,148,149,151,152,156,188,225,243,252,409,425,441,599,982,1041,1045,1179,1184,1185,1186,1187,1188,1189,1190,1340,2734,2767,2771,3267,4658,4837
mustga/56,60,245,255,308,322,829,1003,1635,3013
nord/99,370,3122,3579,4616,4869
objectiv/5,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,64,68,95,985
osp/357,707,1140,1152,1873
perm/15,145,917,2847,2848,3580,3583,3584,3585,3586,3587,3588,3589,3590,3591,3592,3593,3594
persequi/1,2,11,12,13,14,16,17,18,19,22,24,61,138,140,142,150,157,158,160,161,163,166,167,168,169,170,171,316,317,318,319,320,332,333,572,1113,1242,3024
pis/3,4,5,6,7,8,10,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,60,82,144,246,290,365,374,382,392,453,470,471,603,628,699,729,730,760,795,796,797,798,799,800,801,806,1765,2074,2419
Pro/4203
proto/4509
public/1,3,4,5,64,68,81,88,197,295,298,422,1431,1432,1433,1434,1435,1436,1437,1438,1439,1440,1441,1442,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1448,1449,1450,1451,1452,4485,4521
puls/30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,48,49,50,51,52,58,59,68,70,80,211,365,1336,1764,1812,2966,2967,2968,2969,2970,2971,2972,2973,2974,2975,2976,2977,2979,2980,2981,2982,2983,2984
reviv/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,57,71,72,73,74,85,94,97,100,101,103,104,535,660,685,686,687,688,689,690,708,709,710,711,712,713,714,715,716,717,718,744,745,746,747
rim/3,4,5,6,7,8,30,31,32,33,34,35,36,37,38,39,40,41,42,43,44,70,165,301,389,390,421,446,483,529,530,531,547,548,549,550,551,552,553,576,639,657,658,1047,1641,1858
sbrajaz/399
schi/95,369,1118,1406,1570,1662,2577,4951
sor/3,5,143,1092,1308,1470,2533,4205,4206,4207,4214,4216,4936,4944
stretg/1,3,5,81,132,162,314,329,330,340,341,342,343,344,345,346,347,348,349,355,356,376,961,1393,1394,1395,1396,2298,2299,4998,4999,5000
sulet/1822
surm/2324,2325,2613,2842,2843,2844,3566,3569,3570,3572,3573,3576,3578
tas/60,82,571,1402,2405,2406
ten/56,82,136,138,140,142,150,157,158,159,160,161,163,164,166,167,168,169,170,171,173,175,176,404,433,434,476,518,541,572,649,741,776,815,816,817,818,819,936,1031,1113,1116,1117,1208,1347,1609,1610,1611,2096,2369,3603,3968
tiran/446,1855,3145,3160,3164,3165,3167
tor/5,56,60,82,83,155,180,244,336,522,544,890,965,1122,1239,1403,1526,1836,1936,2316,2317,2776,2777,2778,2779,2780,2782,3470,3471,3472,3473,4015,4887,4889
turna/4910
vin/1,10,98,535,556,660,670,685,686,687,688,689,690,711,712,713,714,715,716,717,718,879,2315,2539,4864,4865,4961
volv/3,4,5,6,7,8,57,3604
